Tennessee, session 114, SB0953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-36-823, is amended by deleting the
language "annually" and substituting instead the language "annually, or at such other intervals
as may be set by the board,".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0953
002994
- 1 -